src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-1E-myyqnn_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - mââʹnn: # Noun 1E-stem 'egg/muna' - full paradigm
# 
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Nom: mââʹnn
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Gen: mââʹn
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Acc: mââʹn
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Ill: mânna
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Loc: mââʹnest
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Com: mõõʹnin
     mââʹnn+N+Ess: mââʹnnen
     mââʹnn+N+Par: mââʹnned
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Abe: [mââʹntaa, mââʹntää]
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Nom: mââʹn
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Gen: mõõʹni
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Acc: mõõʹnid
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Ill: mõõʹnid
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Loc: mõõʹnin
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Com: mõõʹnivuiʹm
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Abe: [mõõʹnitaa, mõõʹnitää]

##
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: mâânnam
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: mâânnad
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: mââʹnnes
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: mââʹnnem
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: mââʹnned
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: mââʹnnez
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: mâânnan
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: mâânad
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: mââʹnes
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: mââʹnnen
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: mââʹned
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: mââʹnez
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: mâânnan
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: mâânad
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: mââʹnes
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: mââʹnnen
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: mââʹned
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: mââʹnez
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: mânnsan
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: mânnsad
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: mânnses
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: mânnseen
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: mânnseed
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: mânnseez
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: mâʹnstan
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: mâʹnstad
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: mâʹnstes
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: mâʹnsteen
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: mâʹnsteed
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: mâʹnsteez
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: mõõʹninan
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: mõõʹninad
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: mõõʹnines
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: mõõʹnineen
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: mõõʹnineed
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: mõõʹnineez
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: mâânnantää
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: mâânadtää
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: mââʹnestää
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: mââʹnnentää
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: mââʹnedtää
     mââʹnn+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: mââʹneztää
     mââʹnn+N+Ess+PxSg1: mâʹnnʼnan
     mââʹnn+N+Ess+PxSg2: mâʹnnʼnad
     mââʹnn+N+Ess+PxSg3: mâʹnnʼnes
     mââʹnn+N+Ess+PxPl1: mâʹnnʼneen
     mââʹnn+N+Ess+PxPl2: mâʹnnʼneed
     mââʹnn+N+Ess+PxPl3: mâʹnnʼneez
#
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: mâânnan
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: mâânad
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: mââʹnes
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: mââʹnnen
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: mââʹned
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: mââʹnez
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: mõõʹnään
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: mõõʹnääd
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: mõõʹnees
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: mõõʹneen
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: mõõʹneed
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: mõõʹneez
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: mõõʹnään
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: mõõʹnääd
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: mõõʹnees
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: mõõʹneen
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: mõõʹneed
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: mõõʹneez
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: mõõʹnään
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: mõõʹnääd
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: mõõʹnees
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: mõõʹneen
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: mõõʹneed
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: mõõʹneez
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: mõõʹninan
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: mõõʹninad
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: mõõʹnines
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: mõõʹnineen
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: mõõʹnineed
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: mõõʹnineez
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: mõõʹnäänvuiʹm
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: mõõʹnäädvuiʹm
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: mõõʹneesvuiʹm
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: mõõʹneenvuiʹm
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: mõõʹneedvuiʹm
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: mõõʹneezvuiʹm
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: mõõʹnääntää
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: mõõʹnäädtää
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: mõõʹneestää
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: mõõʹneentää
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: mõõʹneedtää
     mââʹnn+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: mõõʹneeztää
#
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: mâânaž
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen: mââna
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc: mââna
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill: mâânʼže
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: mâânast
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: mâânain
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe: [mâânataa, mâânatää]
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess: mâânʼžen
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Par: mâânʼžed
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: mââna
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen: mâânai
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc: mâânaid
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill: mâânaid
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc: mâânain
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com: mâânaivuiʹm
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe: [mâânaitaa, mâânaitää]
# according to Pekka 1991: 163--164
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: mâânžam
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: mâânžad
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: mâânžes
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: mâânžeem
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: mâânžeed
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: mâânžeez
     
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: mâânžan
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: mâânžad
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: mâânžes
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: mâânžeen
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: mâânžeed
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: mâânžeez
     
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: mâânžan
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: mâânžad
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: mâânžes
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: mâânžeen
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: mâânžeed
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: mâânžeez

     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: mâânžasan
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: mâânžasad
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: mâânžasas
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: mâânžeʹsen
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: mâânžeʹsed
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: mâânžeʹsez
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: mânstan
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: mânstad
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: mânstes
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: mânsteen
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: mânsteed
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: mânsteez
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: mâânainan
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: mâânainad
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: mâânaines
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: mâânaineen
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: mâânaineed
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: mâânaineez
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: mâânžantää
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: mâânžadtää
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: mâânžestää
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: mâânžeentää
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: mâânžeedtää
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: mâânžeeztää

#     
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: mâânžan
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: mâânžad
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: mâânžes
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: mâânžeen
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: mâânžeed
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: mâânžeez
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: mâânään
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: mâânääd
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: mâânees
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: mââneen
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: mââneed
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: mââneez
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: mâânään
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: mâânääd
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: mâânees
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: mââneen
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: mââneed
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: mââneez
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: mâânään
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: mâânääd
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: mâânees
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: mââneen
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: mââneed
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: mââneez
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: mâânainan
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: mâânainad
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: mâânaines
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: mâânaineen
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: mâânaineed
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: mâânaineez
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: mâânäänvuiʹm
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: mâânäädvuiʹm
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: mââneesvuiʹm
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: mââneenvuiʹm
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: mââneedvuiʹm
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: mââneezvuiʹm
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: mâânääntää
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: mâânäädtää
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: mââneestää
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: mââneentää
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: mââneedtää
     mââʹnn+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: mââneeztää
